District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Tree Preservation Enhancement Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Urban Forest Preservation Act of 2002, effective June 12, 2003 (D.C. Law
14-309; D.C. Official Code § 8-651.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 102(5) (D.C. Official Code § 8-651.02(5)) is amended by striking the phrase
“between 44 inches” and inserting the phrase “between 40 inches” in its place.
(b) Section 104(e) (D.C. Official Code § 8-651.04(e)) is amended to read as follows:
“(e)(1) The Mayor shall, beginning July 1, 2029, and every 3 years thereafter, increase
the fee described in subsection (b)(3) of this section and the fine described in subsection (d) of
this section by regulation to adjust for inflation using the Consumer Price Index.
“(2) In addition to the increases under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Mayor
may increase the fee described in subsection (b)(3) of this section or the fine described in
subsection (d) of this section by regulation.”.
(c) Section 104a(d) (D.C. Official Code § 8-651.04a(d)) is amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) The Mayor shall, beginning July 1, 2029, and every 3 years thereafter, increase
the fine described in subsection (c) of this section by regulation to adjust for inflation using the
Consumer Price Index.
“(2) In addition to the increase under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Mayor
may increase the fee described in subsection (c) of this section by regulation.”.
(d) Section 107 (D.C. Official Code § 8-651.07) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 107. Tree Fund.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Tree Fund (“Fund”), which shall be
administered by the District Department of Transportation in accordance with subsection (c) of
this section.
“(b) All funds collected from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:
“(1) Donations; and
“(2) Fees and penalties collected pursuant to this act or any rule established
pursuant to this act.
“(c) Money in the Fund:
“(1) Shall be used for the following purposes:
“(A) Tree planting in public space or District-owned land, including parks
and school property; and
“(B) Providing income-based subsidies to assist District residents with
costs related to the removal and replacement of hazardous trees; and
“(2) May be used for the following purposes:
“(A) Tree planting on private land, in coordination with the Department of
Energy and Environment;
“(B) Conducting survival checks of trees planted on public or private land
pursuant to paragraph (1)(A) of this subsection and subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and
“(C) For any other costs associated with implementing this act, including
administrative costs.
“(d) The Mayor shall ensure that trees planted pursuant to this section are checked for
survival at appropriate intervals to evaluate canopy replacement and inform future planting
decisions.
“(e) Private voluntary donations to the Fund shall be tax deductible for purposes of
District income and franchise taxes.
“(f)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3